Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.040

Cities and counties authorized to amend state building code—Limitations.

The governing body of each county or city is authorized to amend the state building code as it applies within the jurisdiction of the county or city. The minimum performance standards of the codes and the objectives enumerated in RCW 19.27.020 shall not be diminished by any county or city amendments.

Nothing in this chapter shall authorize any modifications of the requirements of chapter 70.92 RCW.

[ 1990 c 2 s 11; 1985 c 360 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 14 s 12; 1974 ex.s. c 96 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1990 c 2: "Sections 1 through 4, 6, 7, 9, and 10 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect March 1, 1990. Sections 11 and 12 of this act shall take effect January 1, 1991. Section 8 of this act shall take effect July 1, 1991." [ 1990 c 2 s 14.]

Findings—Severability—1990 c 2: See notes following RCW 19.27A.015.